Hawaii, session 2025, GM1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII;
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a
persistent housing crisis. Demand for housing significantly
outpaces supply, particularly in urban areas. Transit-oriented
development districts present a critical opportunity for
efficient land use by promoting higher-density development near
public transit infrastructure, thereby maximizing the value of
public investments. Higher residential density in transit-
oriented development districts increases public transit
ridership, thus reducing dependency on private automobiles and
lowering greenhouse gas emissions, which supports the State's
climate resilience and sustainability objectives.
The legislature established transit-oriented development
infrastructure improvement districts to foster community
development by strategically investing in infrastructure
improvements through Act 184, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. The
legislature found that transit-oriented development promotes
development patterns that enhance residents' quality of life;
2025-3374 HB1409 GDI HMSO
iiiiHHiiiiniiinii

Page 2 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
preserve the natural environment; provide a range of housing
choices for residents; and encourage walking, biking, and the
use of mass transit. Furthermore, the legislature concluded
that the State plays an important role in overcoming barriers to
transit-oriented development by encouraging needed investments
in improving regional infrastructure such as roads, sewers,
power, communication, and storm water management systems.
The legislature further recognizes that the ready
availability of affordable workforce housing near transit hubs
reduces transportation costs and improves access to employment,
education, and other essential services, especially for low- and
moderate-income households, thereby advancing social and
economic equity for the people of Hawaii.
The underutilization of land in transit-oriented
development districts, due partially to restrictive development
standards, undermines the economic and environmental benefits of
state investments in county-designated transit-oriented
development infrastructure improvement districts, contributes to
urban sprawl, and increases infrastructure costs and
environmental degradation.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
linmiiMiiiiii

Page 3 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The legislature finds that numerous jurisdictions,
including California, Oregon, and Washington, have adopted
minimum density standards for transit-oriented developments,
demonstrating the effectiveness of these measures in increasing
housing supply while bolstering transit systems. Transit-
oriented development infrastructure improvement districts can
increase residential density near transit hubs in order to
foster vibrant, walkable communities; support local businesses;
and generate higher property tax revenues, contributing to
Hawaii's fiscal and economic vitality.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Temporarily establish the mixed-income subaccount
within the rental housing revolving fund for five
years to finance certain projects, including those
located in transit-oriented developments;
(2) Require the transit-oriented development
infrastructure improvement district board to consider
the infrastructure needs of transit-supportive density
requirements; and
(3) Require the strategic plan developed by the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 3
HiniiDHIIIHUIH

Page 4 H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
to delineate transit-oriented development areas for
each county.
SECTION 2. Section 201H-202, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201H-202 Rental housing revolving fund. (a) There is
established the rental housing revolving fund to be administered
by the corporation.
(b) An amount from the fund, to be set by the corporation
and authorized by the legislature, may be used for
administrative expenses incurred by the corporation in
administering the corporation's housing finance programs;
provided that fund moneys shall not be used to finance day-to-
day administrative expenses of projects allotted fund moneys.
(c) The following may be deposited into the fund:
[appropriations]
(1) Appropriations made by the legislature[7—convoyanee]£
(2) Conveyance taxes pursuant to section 247-7 [7—p-r-i-vate]£
(3) Private contributions [7—repayment-]£
(4) Repayment of loans[7—interest,—other]£
(5) Interest;
(6) Other returns [7-]£ and [mefteya]
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(7) Moneys from other sources.
(d) [?be] Except as provided in subsection (f) , the fund
shall be used to provide loans for the development, pre­
development, construction, acquisition, preservation, and
substantial rehabilitation of rental housing units. The
corporation shall not forgive any loan made from the fund unless
the corporation forecloses on the project. Permitted uses of
the fund may include but are not limited to planning, design,
land acquisition, costs of options, agreements of sale,
downpayments, equity financing, capacity building of nonprofit
housing developers, credit enhancement, gap financing, or other
housing development services or activities as provided in rules
adopted by the corporation pursuant to chapter 91. The rules
may provide for a means of recapturing loans or grants made from
the fund if a rental housing project financed under the fund is
refinanced or sold at a later date. The rules may also provide
that moneys from the fund shall be leveraged with other
financial resources to the extent possible.
(e) [Moneys] Except as provided in subsection (f), moneys
available in the fund shall be used for the purpose of
providing, in whole or in part, loans for rental housing
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
iiiiniiBiiiiioiiinii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
projects demonstrating project readiness, efficiency, and
feasibility acceptable to the corporation in the following order
of priority:
[4-1-)- -For ■projccto that were awarded low-incomc-houoing
ered-its pursuant to-paragraph—(-3-)-7—prdrori-t-y shall -bo
given to projeete with a porpctua-1 affordability
commitment;
4-3-)-] (1) Projects or units in projects that are allocated
low-income housing credits pursuant to the state
housing credit ceiling under section 42 (h) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or projects
or units in projects that are funded by programs of
the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development and United States Department of
Agriculture Rural Development wherein:
(A) At least fifty per cent of the available units
are for persons and families with incomes at or
below eighty per cent of the median family income
of which at least five per cent of the available
units are for persons and families with incomes
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
ilillRIIIOIPIIIHIimiR

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
at or below thirty per cent of the median family
income; and
(B) The remaining units are for persons and families
with incomes at or below one hundred per cent of
the median family income;
provided that the corporation may establish rules to
ensure full occupancy of fund projects; provided
further that for projects that were awarded low-income
housing credits pursuant to this paragraph, priority
shall be given to projects with a perpetual
affordability commitment. For purposes of this
paragraph, "perpetual" means the useful life of the
project; and
[43-)-] (2) Mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed-
income rental project [wherein all of the available
unite are] for persons and families with incomes at or
below one hundred forty per cent of the median family
income.
(f) There is established within the fund a mixed-income
subaccount. Moneys in the mixed-income subaccount shall be used
for financing, including but not limited to loans, equity
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
iiiMiininiiiiniiiiii

Page 8 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
investments, and credit enhancement, for mixed-income rentals
for qualified residents as defined in section 201H-32. The
corporation shall establish an application process for the
allocation of funds in the mixed-income subaccount, separate
from the fund allocation process pursuant to section 201H-
204 (c), that gives preference to projects meeting the following
criteria:
(1) A diverse range of affordability, prioritizing persons
and families with incomes up to one hundred forty per
cent of the median family income;
(.2 ) Projects located on state or county owned land or
developed in partnership with the State or a county;
(3) Projects that efficiently use state funding;
(4) Mixed-income rental projects or units in a mixed-
income rental project in an area that satisfy transit-
supportive density requirements, as defined in section
206E-246; and
(5) Any other criteria as the corporation deems necessary
to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
If the corporation, after applying the process described in
this' subsection, finds a nonprofit or government project equally
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO {
liiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
ranked with a for-profit project, the corporation shall give
preference to the nonprofit or government project in allotting
funds from the mixed-income subaccount.
Moneys derived from the repayment of loans funded by the
mixed-income subaccount, interest thereon, and related fees and
returns shall be deposited into the fund.
[4^^] _(^ There is established within the fund a bond
volume cap recycling program subaccount. The bond volume cap
recycling program subaccount shall be maintained as a reserve
for the bond volume cap recycling program established pursuant
to section 39B-2(f).
[4^] Jh}. corporation shall submit an annual report to
the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of each regular session describing the projects funded and, with
respect to rental housing projects targeted for persons and
families with incomes at or below thirty per cent of the median
family income, its efforts to develop those rental housing
projects, a description of proposals submitted for this target
group and action taken on the proposals, and any barriers to
developing housing units for this target group.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 9

Page 10 H.B. NO. SS’i
C.D. 1
(i) For the purposes of this subpart, the applicable
median family income shall be the median family income for the
county or standard metropolitan statistical area in which the
project is located as determined by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, as adjusted from time to time.
[(i)] (j) The corporation may provide loans under this
section; provided that the corporation shall establish loan-to-
value ratios to protect the fund from inordinate risk and that
under no circumstances shall the rules permit the loan-to-value
ratio to exceed one hundred per cent; provided further that the
underwriting guidelines include a debt-coverage ratio of no less
than 1.0 to 1.
[4d-h] (k) For the period commencing July 1, 2005, through
June 30, 2009, the fund may be used to provide grants for rental
units set aside for persons and families with incomes at or
below thirty per cent of the median family income in any project
financed in whole or in part by the fund in proportion of those
units to the total number of units in the project. At the
conclusion of the period described in this subsection, the
corporation shall report to the legislature on the number and
use of grants provided and whether the grants were an effective
2025-3374 HB1409 GDI HMSO 10
IHlDllllliniliBlillll

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
use of the funds for purposes of developing rental housing for
families at or below thirty per cent of the median family
income."
SECTION 3. Section 201H-204, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Activities eligible for assistance from the fund
shall include but not be limited to:
(1) New construction, rehabilitation, or preservation of
low-income rental housing units that meet the criteria
for eligibility described in subsection (c) [f-] or
section 2Q1H-202(f);
(2) The leveraging of moneys with the use of fund assets;
(3) Pre-development activity grants or loans to nonprofit
organizations; and
(4) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of
preservation as low-income or very low-income
housing."
2. By amending subsection (c) to read:
"(c) [5fee] Except as provided in section 201H-202(f), the
corporation shall establish an application process for fund
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 11
liiiniMiffliiiiiiiHii

Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
allocation that gives preference to projects meeting the
following criteria that are listed in descending order of
priority:
(1) Serve the original target group;
(2) Provide at least five per cent of the total number of
units for persons and families with incomes at or
below thirty per cent of the median family income;
(3) Provide the maximum number of units for persons or
families with incomes at or below eighty per cent of
the median family income;
(4) Are committed to serving the target group over a
longer period of time;
(5) Increase the integration of income levels of the
immediate community area;
(6) Meet the geographic needs of the target group of the
proposed rental housing project, such as proximity to
employment centers and services; and
(7) Have favorable past performance in developing, owning,
managing, or maintaining affordable rental housing.
The corporation may include other criteria as it deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of this subpart.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 1

Page 13 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
If the corporation, after applying the process described in
this subsection, finds a nonprofit project equally ranked with a
for-profit or government project, the corporation shall give
preference to the nonprofit project in allotting fund moneys."
SECTION 4 Section 206E-246, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[■£•] §2O6E-246 [-3-] Transit-oriented development
.8 infrastructure improvement district program; assessment; rules,
(a) The board shall develop a transit-oriented development
infrastructure improvement district program to identify
infrastructure improvements within each district. In
determining the required infrastructure improvements to be
undertaken, the board shall consider the infrastructure needs of
transit-supportive density requirements, the strategic plan
prepared by the Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented
development pursuant to section 226-63(c)j_ and subsequent plans
and studies prepared to further implement the strategic plan and
the transit-oriented development projects therein.
(b) Whenever the board determines to undertake, or causes
to be undertaken, any infrastructure improvement as part of the
program, the cost of providing the infrastructure improvement
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
IIIIUHDIiniillllllHII

Page 14 H.B. NO. Jis’-
C.D. 1
may be assessed against the real property in each district
specially benefiting from the infrastructure improvement. The
board shall determine the areas of each district that will
benefit from the infrastructure improvement to be undertaken,
and if less than the entire district benefits, the board may
establish assessment areas within the district. The board may
issue and sell bonds in amounts as may be authorized by the
legislature to provide funds to finance the infrastructure
improvements. The board may fix the assessments against real
property specially benefited. All assessments made pursuant to
this section shall be a statutory lien against each lot or
parcel of land assessed from the date of the notice declaring
the assessment until the assessment is paid, and the lien shall
have priority over all other liens except the lien of property
taxes. As between liens of assessments, the earlier lien shall
be superior to the later lien.
(c) Bonds issued to provide funds to finance transit-
oriented development infrastructure improvements shall be
secured solely by the real properties benefited or improved, the
assessments thereon, or the revenues derived from the program
for which the bonds are issued, including reserve accounts and
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 1
iiiiiiiHiiiiHiiiin

H B NO
C.D. 1
earnings thereon, insurance proceeds, and other revenues, or any
combination thereof. The bonds may be additionally secured by
the pledge or assignment of loans and other agreements or any
note or other undertaking, obligation, or property held by the
board. Bonds issued pursuant to this section and the income
therefrom shall be exempt from all state and county taxation,
except transfer and estate taxes. The bonds shall be issued
subject to rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in
assessing real property for transit-oriented development
infrastructure improvement, the board shall assess the real
property within an assessment area according to the special
benefits conferred upon the real property by the infrastructure
improvement. These methods may include assessment on a frontage
basis or according to the area of real property within an
assessment area or any other assessment method that assesses the
real property according to the special benefit conferred, or any
combination thereof. No assessment levied against real property
specially benefited as provided by this part shall constitute a
tax on real property within the meanings of any constitutional
or statutory provisions. No assessment shall be levied against
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO
■■miKiniiiiiiiiiii

Page 16 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
real property owned by the federal government, the State, or a
county, or an agency thereof, without the prior written consent
of the owner,
(e) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to
provide for the method of undertaking and financing transit-
oriented development infrastructure improvement in an assessment
area or an entire district. The rules adopted pursuant to this
section shall include but not be limited to:
(1) The methods by which the board shall establish
assessment areas;
(2) The method of assessment of real properties specially
benefited;
(3) The costs to be borne by the board, the county in
which districts are situated, and the property owners;
(4) The procedures before the board relating to the
creation of the assessment areas by the owners of real
property therein, including provisions for petitions,
bids, contracts, bonds, and notices;
(5) Provisions relating to assessments;
(6) Provisions relating to financing, including bonds,
revolving funds, advances from available funds,
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 16
iDiiiniMiniHiii

Page 17 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
special funds for payment of bonds, payment of
principal and interest, and sale and use of the bonds;
(7) Provisions relating to funds and refunding of
outstanding debts;
(8) Provisions relating to limitations on time to sue; and
(9) Other related provisions.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary,
the board may, in its discretion, enter into any agreement with
the county in which the districts are located to implement all
or part of the purposes of this section.
(g) All sums collected under this section shall be
deposited into the transit-oriented development infrastructure
improvement district special fund established under section
206E-247 and shall be applied solely to:
(1) The payment of the principal and interest on the bonds
and the cost of administering, operating, and
maintaining the program;
(2) The establishment of reserves; and
(3) Other purposes as may be authorized in the proceedings
providing for the issuance of the bonds.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO

Page 18 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
If any surplus remains in the fund after the payment of the
bonds chargeable against the fund, it shall be credited to and
become a part of the fund.
(h) The transit-oriented development infrastructure
improvements to be financed through bonds issued by the board
may be dedicated to the county in which the infrastructure
improvements are to be located. The board shall ensure that the
infrastructure improvements are designed and constructed to meet
county requirements and shall enter into an agreement with the
county for dedication of the public facilities.
(i) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, whenever it
becomes necessary to remove, relocate, replace, or reconstruct
public utility facilities that are part of a program, the board
shall establish by rule the allocation of cost between the
board, the affected public utilities, and the properties that
may specially benefit from the improvement, if any. In
determining the allocation of cost, the board shall consider the
cost allocation policies for districts established by the county
in which the removal, relocation, replacement, or reconstruction
is to take place.
(j) For the purposes of this section;
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 18
liBiiiiimiiiniD

Page 19 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"County-designated transit-oriented development area” has
the same meaning as defined in section 226-63(d).
"Floor area ratio" means the quotient, expressed as a
decimal number, that results from dividing a structure's total
floor area by the total area of the lot or parcel on which the
structure is located.
"Ministerial" means a permit process based upon standards
established through county ordinance or rule and issued by the
director of the county agency responsible for land use or a
single county officer designated by ordinance.
"Transit-supportive density" means a county-designated
transit-oriented development area:
(1) With development standards that allow a floor area
ratio of at least:
(A) 4.0 for all uses that are permitted in a county-
designated transit-oriented development area or
by the underlying county zoning;
(B) 6.0 for all uses that are permitted in a county-
designated transit-oriented development area
within one-half mile of a station of a locally
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 19
liVIMIIHIliilllMIIIII

Page 20
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
preferred alternative for a mass transit project;
and
(C) For all uses that are permitted within one-
quarter mile of a station of a locally preferred
alternative for a mass transit project, whichever
is greater:
(i) 7.0;
(ii) The maximum floor area ratio allowed by the
adopted transit-oriented development special
district; or
(iii) The maximum floor area ratio allowed by the
applicable transit-oriented development
plan;
(2) For which permits for development are processed as a
ministerial permit subject to applicable objective
design standards;
Where there is no imposition of a development standard
that renders it impracticable to build a usable
structure for the permitted uses at the applicable
transit-supportive density; and
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 20
iiimmiiiiiiiiiii

Page 21
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Where funds collected pursuant to section 46-16.8 have
been expended in the county-designated transit-
oriented development area in which the development is
located."
SECTION 5. Section 226-63, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
" [-F] §226-63 [■]-] Hawaii interagency council for transit-
oriented development[—]; transit-oriented development planning
and implementation. (a) There is established the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development, which
shall be an advisory body exempt from section 26-34, to
coordinate and facilitate state agency transit-oriented
development planning, and facilitate consultation and
collaboration between the State and the counties on transit-
oriented development initiatives. The Hawaii interagency
council for transit-oriented development shall be established
within the department of business, economic development, and
tourism for administrative purposes.
(b) The Hawaii interagency council for transit-oriented
development shall:
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO


Page 22 1409
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Serve as the State's transit-oriented development
planning and policy development entity with
representation from state and county government and
the community;
(2) Formulate and advise the governor on the
implementation of a strategic plan to [address] plan
for and implement transit-oriented development
projects, including ttse] mixed-use and
affordable for-sale and rental housing projects, on
[s^tat-e] lands in county-designated transit-oriented
development areas in each county;
(3) Facilitate the acquisition of funding and resources
for state and county transit-oriented development
programs, including affordable for-sale and rental
housing projects, on state and county lands;
(4) Monitor the preparation and conduct of plans and
studies to facilitate implementation of state transit-
oriented development plans prepared pursuant to this
section, including but not limited to the preparation
of site or master plans and implementation plans and
studies;
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 22
IIIMIiMMIIffl

Page 23
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Review all capital improvement project requests to the
legislature for transit-oriented development projects,
including [mixed use] mixed-use and affordable for^
^al^ and rental housing projects, on [sfeafee-] lands
within county-designated transit-oriented development
[•aeftea] are^ or within a one-half-mile radius of
public transit stations, if a county has not
designated transit-oriented development zones;
(6) Recommend policy, regulatory, and statutory changes,
and identify resource strategies for the successful
execution of the strategic plan;
(7) Assemble accurate fiscal and demographic information
to support policy development and track outcomes;
(8) Consider collaborative transit-oriented development
initiatives of other states that have demonstrated
positive outcomes; and
(9) Report annually to the governor, the legislature, and
the mayor of each county on the progress of its
activities, including formulation and progress on the
strategic plan no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 2-
iiiiiiinHiiiiiiiiMiiii

H B NO
C.D. 1
(c) The strategic plan developed by the Hawaii interagency
council for transit-oriented development shall:
(1) Coordinate with the counties on transit-oriented
development;
(2) For each county, compile an inventory of state,
county, and [private acctor] private-sector transit-
oriented development projects lacking infrastructure,
identifying the type of infrastructure each project
lacks, and the approximate time frame when additional
capacity is needed;
(3) Prioritize the development of transit-oriented
development projects, including [mi-xed use] mixed-use
and affordable for-sale and rental housing projects,
on state and county lands;
(4) Identify financing and prioritize state financing for
the public infrastructure, facility, and service
investments required to support transit-oriented
development, [fftixed-Hase-rl mixed-use, and affordable
for-sale and rental housing [project piano;—and] in
county-designated transit-oriented development areas;
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 24

Page 25 1409
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Encourage and promote partnerships between public and
private entities to identify, renovate, and secure
affordable housing options on state and county lands
within county-designated transit-oriented development
areas or within a one-half-mile radius of public
transit stations, if a county has not designated
transit-oriented development [-eeftes-r] areas; and
(6) Delineate for each county, transit-oriented
development areas within which transit-rich,
pedestrian-oriented development is desired and
investment in transit-oriented development and
supporting infrastructure is to be directed.
(d) For the purposes of this section and implementation of
the strategic plan statewide:
"County-designated transit-oriented development area" means
a geographic area designated by a county for transit-oriented
development by an adopted ordinance, plan, or resolution, and
delineated in the strategic plan pursuant to this section, that
generally consists of lands within a one-half-mile radius of a
transit hub or transit station; provided that the actual
boundaries may differ under specific circumstances.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 25

Page 26
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Transit-oriented development" means the development of
compact, dense, walkable, pedestrian-oriented, mixed-use
neighborhoods centered around transit stations or transit hubs
of public transit systems. "Transit-oriented development"
features a mix of uses, such as housing, office, retail, civic
and institutional, and other services and amenities at densities
that support transit ridership and walkability.
"Transit-oriented development project" means a development
project located within a geographic area designated as a
transit-oriented development area by the county with a medium-
to high-density mix of uses, such as housing, office, retail,
and other amenities, that is designed to promote walkability and
safe and convenient access to transit services."
SECTION 6. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that sections 2 and 3 of this Act shall be repealed on
June 30, 2030, and sections 201H-202 and 201H-204, Hawaii
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 2«
MHIHIHnillHni

Page 27
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they
read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act.
2025-3374 HB1409 CDl HMSO 27

1409
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2025

HB No. 1409, HD 1,SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1409, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
234